Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-688
Rules and regulations.

The Chief Water Officer may adopt and promulgate all rules and regulations necessary or desirable to secure compliance with the Industrial Ground Water Regulatory Act. The Chief Water Officer shall by regulation specify the contents and scope of the hydrologic evaluation required by section 46-678, taking into account the current state of hydrologic knowledge and techniques, and the factors for permit approval listed in section 46-683.

Laws 1981, LB 56, § 14;

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 78;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 202.